Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2495.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3735(a) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3735. Homicide by vehicle while driving under influence.(a) Offense defined.--[(1) A person who unintentionally causes the death of another person as the result of a violation of section 3802 (relating to driving under influence of alcohol or controlled substance) and who is convicted of violating section 3802:(i) is guilty of a felony of the second degree;(ii) is guilty of a felony of the first degree if, before sentencing on the present violation, the person has incurred a conviction, adjudication of delinquency or 123456789101112131415161718 other form of preliminary disposition for any of the following:(A) An offense under section 3802.(B) An offense under former section 3731 (relating to driving under influence of alcohol or controlled substance).(C) An offense which constitutes a felony under this subchapter.(D) An offense substantially similar to an offense under clause (A), (B) or (C) in another jurisdiction.(E) Any combination of the offenses under clause (A), (B), (C) or (D); or(iii) is guilty of a felony of the first degree if the person convicted of a violation of subsection (a) is also convicted of a violation of section 3802(h)(1).](1.1) A person who unintentionally causes the death of another person as the result of a violation of section 3802 (relating to driving under influence of alcohol or controlled substance) and who is convicted of violating section 3802 is guilty of a felony of the first degree.[(2) The sentencing court shall order a person convicted under paragraph (1)(i) to serve a minimum term of imprisonment of not less than three years. A consecutive three-year term of imprisonment shall be imposed for each victim whose death is the result of a violation of section 3802.](2.1) Except as provided in paragraphs (3), (5) and (6), the sentencing court shall order a person convicted under paragraph (1.1) to serve a minimum term of imprisonment of 20260HB2495PN3380 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not less than five years. A consecutive five-year term of imprisonment shall be imposed for each victim whose death is the result of a violation of section 3802.(3) [The] Subject to paragraph (5), the sentencing court shall order a person convicted under paragraph [(1)(ii)] (1.1) to serve a minimum term of imprisonment of:(i) Not less than [five] seven years if, before sentencing on the present violation, the person has one prior conviction, adjudication of delinquency or other form of preliminary disposition for any of the [offenses listed under paragraph (1)(ii)(A), (B), (C), (D) or (E). A consecutive five-year term of imprisonment shall be imposed for each victim whose death is the result of a violation of section 3802.] following offenses:(A) An offense under section 3802. (B) An offense under former section 3731 (relating to driving under influence of alcohol or controlled substance).(C) An offense which constitutes a felony under this subchapter.(D) An offense substantially similar to an offense under clause (A), (B) or (C) in another jurisdiction.(E) Any combination of the offenses under clause (A), (B), (C) or (D).(ii) Not less than seven years if, [before sentencing on the present violation, the person has incurred a prior conviction for violating section 3802(h)(1) or at least two prior convictions, adjudications of delinquency or other forms of preliminary disposition for 20260HB2495PN3380 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any of the offenses listed under paragraph (1)(ii)(A), (B), (C), (D) or (E). A consecutive seven-year term of imprisonment shall be imposed for each victim whose death is the result of a violation of section 3802.] during the commission of the offense, the person does any of the following:(A) Commits a violation of section 3802(c), (d) or (h)(1).(B) Commits a violation of section 3733 (relating to fleeing or attempting to elude police officer).(C) Has a minor passenger in the vehicle.[(4) The sentencing court shall order a person convicted under paragraph (1)(iii) to serve a minimum term of imprisonment of not less than five years. A consecutive five-year term of imprisonment shall be imposed for each victim whose death is the result of a violation of section 3802(h)(1).](5) For a conviction under paragraph (3), a consecutive seven-year term of imprisonment shall be imposed for each victim whose death is the result of a violation of section 3802.(6) The sentencing court shall order a person convicted under paragraph (1.1) to serve a minimum term of imprisonment of not less than 10 years if, before sentencing on the present violation, the person has incurred a prior conviction for violating section 3802(h)(1) or at least two prior convictions, adjudications of delinquency or other forms of preliminary disposition for any of the offenses listed under paragraph (3)(i)(A), (B), (C), (D) or (E). A consecutive 10-20260HB2495PN3380 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 year term of imprisonment shall be imposed for each victim whose death is the result of a violation of section 3802.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2495PN3380 - 5 - 1234